Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1489.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3-132, as
last amended by Section 5, Chapter 323, O.S.L. 2023 (70 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 3-132), is amended to read as follows:
Section 3-132. A. The Oklahoma Charter Schools Act shall apply
only to charter schools formed and operated under the provisions of
the act. Charter schools shall be sponsored only as follows:
Req. No. 12406 Page 1

1. By any school district located in this state, provided such
charter school shall only be located within the geographical
boundaries of the sponsoring district and subject to the
restrictions of Section 3-145.6 of this title;
2. By an accredited comprehensive, regional, or two-year
institution that is a member of The Oklahoma State System of Higher
Education or by a private institution of higher learning located
within this state that is accredited pursuant to Section 4103 of
this title;
3. By a federally recognized Indian tribe, operating a high
school under the authority of the Bureau of Indian Affairs as of
November 1, 2010, if the charter school is for the purpose of
demonstrating native language immersion instruction, and is located
within its former reservation or treaty area boundaries. For
purposes of this paragraph, native language immersion instruction
shall require that educational instruction and other activities
conducted at the school site are primarily conducted in the native
language;
4. Until June 30, 2023, by the State Board of Education and
beginning July 1, 2024, by the Statewide Charter School Board when
the applicant of the charter school is the Office of Juvenile
Affairs or the applicant has a contract with the Office of Juvenile
Affairs and the charter school is for the purpose of providing

Req. No. 12406 Page 2

educ ation services to youth in the custody or supervision of the
state;
5. By a federally recognized Indian tribe only when the charter
school is located within the former reservation or treaty area
boundaries of the tribe on property held in trust by the Bureau of
Indian Affairs of the United States Department of the Interior for
the benefit of the tribe; or
6. By the Statewide Charter School Board. In counties with a
population of fewer than five hundred thousand (500,000), according
to the latest Federal Decennial Census, the Statewide Charter School
Board shall not sponsor more than five new charter schools each
year. Existing charter schools sponsored by the Statewide Charter
School Board shall not apply to the limits prescribed by this
paragraph.
B. An eligible non-school-district sponsor shall give priority
to opening charter schools that serve at-risk student populations or
students from low-performing traditional public schools.
C. An eligible non-school-district sponsor shall give priority
to applicants that have demonstrated a record of operating at least
one school or similar program that demonstrates academic success and
organizational viability and serves student populations similar to
those the proposed charter school seeks to serve. In assessing the
potential for quality replication of a charter school, a sponsor

Req. No. 12406 Page 3

shal l consider the following factors before approving a new site or
school:
1. Evidence of a strong and reliable record of academic success
based primarily on student performance data, as well as other viable
indicators including financial and operational success;
2. A sound, detailed, and well-supported growth plan;
3. Evidence of the ability to transfer successful practices to
a potentially different context that includes reproducing critical
cultural, organizational, and instructional characteristics;
4. Any management organization involved in a potential
replication is fully vetted, and the academic, financial, and
operational records of the schools it operates are found to be
satisfactory;
5. Evidence the program seeking to be replicated has the
capacity to do so successfully without diminishing or putting at
risk its current operations; and
6. A financial structure that ensures that funds attributable
to each charter school within a network and required by law to be
utilized by a school remain with and are used to benefit that
school; and
7. A clear demonstration of community support by members of the
community within the geographical boundaries of the proposed charter
school for the charter school.

Req. No. 12406 Page 4

SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3-134, as
last amended by Section 6, Chapter 323, O.S.L. 2023 (70 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 3-134), is amended to read as follows:
Section 3-134. A. For written applications filed after July 1,
2024, prior to submission of the application to a proposed sponsor
seeking to establish a charter school or to the Statewide Charter
School Board to establish a virtual charter school, the applicant
shall be required to complete training which shall not exceed ten
(10) hours provided by the Statewide Charter School Board on the
process and requirements for establishing a charter school or
virtual charter school. The sponsor of a charter school that enters
into a new or renewed sponsorship contract on or after July 1, 2024,
shall be required to complete training provided by the Statewide
Charter School Board or an organization approved by the Statewide
Charter School Board on the oversight duties of the sponsor. The
Board shall develop and implement the training and publish a list of
organizations approved to provide training by July 1, 2024. The
Board and organizations approved by the Board may provide the
training in any format and manner determined to be efficient and
effective including, but not limited to, web-based training.
B. Except as otherwise provided for in Section 3-137 of this
title, an applicant seeking to establish a virtual charter school
shall submit a written application to the Statewide Charter School
Board, and an applicant seeking to establish a charter school shall
Req. No. 12406 Page 5

subm it a written application to the proposed sponsor as provided for
in subsection E of this section. The application shall include:
1. A mission statement for the charter school or virtual
charter school;
2. A description including, but not limited to, background
information of the organizational structure and the governing board
of the charter school or virtual charter school;
3. A financial plan for the first five (5) years of operation
of the charter school or virtual charter school and a description of
the treasurer or other officers or persons who shall have primary
responsibility for the finances of the charter school or virtual
charter school. Such person shall have demonstrated experience in
school finance or the equivalent thereof;
4. A description of the hiring policy of the charter school or
virtual charter school;
5. The name of the applicant or applicants and requested
sponsor;
6. A description of the facility and location of the charter
school;
7. A description of the grades being served;
8. An outline of criteria designed to measure the effectiveness
of the charter school or virtual charter school;
9. Documentation that the applicants completed training as set
forth in subsection A of this section;
Req. No. 12406 Page 6

10. A description of the minimum and maximum enrollment planned
per year for each term of the charter contract;
11. The proposed calendar for the charter school or virtual
charter school and sample daily schedule;
12. Unless otherwise authorized by law or regulation, a
description of the academic program aligned with state standards;
13. A description of the instructional design of the charter
school or virtual charter school including the type of learning
environment, class size and structure, curriculum overview, and
teaching methods;
14. The plan for using internal and external assessments to
measure and report student progress on the performance framework
developed by the applicant in accordance with Section 3-136 of this
title;
15. The plans for identifying and successfully serving students
with disabilities, students who are English language learners, and
students who are academically behind;
16. A description of cocurricular or extracurricular programs
and how they will be funded and delivered;
17. Plans and time lines for student recruitment and enrollment
including lottery procedures;
18. The student discipline policies for the charter school or
virtual charter school including those for special education
students;
Req. No. 12406 Page 7

19. An organizational chart that clearly presents the
organizational structure of the charter school or virtual charter
school, including lines of authority and reporting between the
governing board, staff, any related bodies such as advisory bodies
or parent and teacher councils, and any external organizations that
will play a role in managing the school;
20. A clear description of the roles and responsibilities for
the governing board, the leadership and management team for the
charter school or virtual charter school, and any other entities
shown in the organizational chart;
21. The leadership and teacher employment policies for the
charter school or virtual charter school;
22. Proposed governing bylaws;
23. Explanations of any partnerships or contractual
partnerships central to the operations or mission of the charter
school or virtual charter school;
24. The plans for providing transportation, food service, and
all other significant operational or ancillary services;
25. Opportunities and expectations for parental involvement;
26. A detailed school start-up plan that identifies tasks, time
lines, and responsible individuals;
27. A description of the financial plan and policies for the
charter school or virtual charter school including financial
controls and audit requirements;
Req. No. 12406 Page 8

28. A description of the insurance coverage the charter school
or virtual charter school will obtain;
29. Start-up and five-year budgets with clearly stated
assumptions;
30. Start-up and first-year cash-flow projections with clearly
stated assumptions;
31. Evidence of anticipated fundraising contributions, if
claimed in the application;
32. A sound facilities plan including backup or contingency
plans if appropriate;
33. A requirement that the charter school or virtual charter
school governing board meet no fewer than ten (10) months of the
year in the state and that for those charter schools outside of
counties with a population of five hundred thousand (500,000) or
more, that a minimum of two (2) members are residents within the
geographic boundary of the charter school;
34. A requirement that the charter school or virtual charter
school follow the requirements of the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act and
Oklahoma Open Records Act; and
35. A copy of any proposed contract between the governing board
of a charter school or virtual charter school and an educational
management organization, as defined by Section 5-200 of this title,
which meets the requirements of the Oklahoma Charter Schools Act;
and
Req. No. 12406 Page 9

36. A demonstration of support for the charter school from
residents of the school district which may include, but is not
limited to, a survey of the school district residents or a petition
signed by the residents of the school district.
C. A board of education of a public school district, public
body, public or private college or university, private person, or
private organization may contract with a sponsor to establish a
charter school or virtual charter school. A private school shall
not be eligible to contract for a charter school or virtual charter
school under the provisions of the Oklahoma Charter Schools Act.
D. The sponsor of a charter school is the board of education of
a school district, a higher education institution, a private
institution of higher learning accredited pursuant to Section 4103
of this title, a federally recognized Indian tribe which meets the
criteria established in Section 3-132 of this title, or beginning
July 1, 2024, the Statewide Charter School Board. Any sponsor
authorized pursuant to subsection A of Section 3-132 of this title
may sponsor one or more charter schools. The physical location of a
charter school sponsored by a board of education of a school
district shall be within the boundaries of the sponsoring school
district. The physical location of a charter school sponsored by
the Statewide Charter School Board pursuant to paragraph 6 of
subsection A of Section 3-132 of this title shall be in the school
district in which the application originated.
Req. No. 12406 Page 10

E. 1. Beginning July 1, 2024, any application seeking to
establish a charter school in this state shall be submitted first to
the school district in which the proposed charter school is to be
located. The school district board of education shall approve or
deny the application within sixty (60) days of receipt of the
application. If the charter school application is denied, nothing
shall prohibit an applicant from submitting a revised application to
the school district board of education, which shall approve or deny
the revised application within sixty (60) days of receipt of the
application.
2. An applicant for a charter school that has been denied
pursuant to paragraph 1 of this subsection may submit an application
to a proposed sponsor listed in paragraphs 2 through 6 of subsection
A of Section 3-132 of this title, which shall either accept or
reject sponsorship of the charter school within ninety (90) days of
receipt of the application. If the proposed sponsor rejects the
application, it shall notify the applicant in writing of the reasons
for the rejection. The applicant may submit a revised application
for reconsideration to the proposed sponsor within thirty (30) days
after receiving notification of the rejection. The proposed sponsor
shall accept or reject the revised application within thirty (30)
days of its receipt.
3. Beginning July 1, 2024, an applicant for a virtual charter
school shall submit an application to the Statewide Charter School
Req. No. 12406 Page 11

Boar d, which shall either accept or reject sponsorship of the
virtual charter school within ninety (90) days of receipt of the
application. If the application is rejected, the Statewide Charter
School Board shall notify the applicant in writing of the reasons
for the rejection. The applicant may submit a revised application
for reconsideration to the Statewide Charter school Board within
thirty (30) days after receiving notification of the rejection. The
Statewide Charter School Board shall accept or reject the revised
application within thirty (30) days of its receipt.
F. A board of education of a school district, a higher
education institution, a private institution of higher learning
accredited pursuant to Section 4103 of this title, or a federally
recognized Indian tribe shall notify the State Board of Education
and the Statewide Charter School Board when it accepts sponsorship
of a charter school. The notification shall include a copy of the
charter of the charter school.
G. Applicants for charter schools and virtual charter schools
proposed to be sponsored by the Statewide Charter School Board may,
upon rejection of a revised application, proceed to binding
arbitration under the commercial rules of the American Arbitration
Association with costs of the arbitration to be borne by the
applicant.
H. If a board of education of a school district, a higher
education institution, a private institution of higher learning
Req. No. 12406 Page 12

accr edited pursuant to Section 4103 of this title, or a federally
recognized Indian tribe accepts sponsorship of a charter school, the
administrative, fiscal, and oversight responsibilities of the school
district, the higher education institution, the private institution
of higher learning accredited pursuant to Section 4103 of this
title, or the federally recognized Indian tribe shall be listed in
the contract. No administrative, fiscal, or oversight
responsibilities of a charter school shall be delegated to a school
district unless the school district agrees to enter into a contract
to assume the responsibilities.
I. A sponsor of a public charter school shall have the
following powers and duties over charter schools it sponsors, and
the Statewide Charter School Board shall have the following powers
and duties over the charter schools and virtual charter schools it
sponsors:
1. Provide services and oversight of the operations of charter
schools or virtual charter schools in the state through annual
performance reviews and reauthorization;
2. Solicit and evaluate charter applications;
3. Approve quality charter applications that meet identified
educational needs and promote a diversity of educational choices;
4. Decline to approve weak or inadequate charter applications;
5. Negotiate and execute sound charter contracts with each
approved public charter school or virtual charter school;
Req. No. 12406 Page 13

6. Approve or deny proposed contracts between the governing
board of a charter school or virtual charter school and an
educational management organization, as defined by section 5-200 of
this title;
7. Monitor, in accordance with charter contract terms, the
performance and legal compliance of charter schools and virtual
charter schools; and
8. Determine whether each charter contract merits renewal,
nonrenewal, or revocation.
J. Sponsors shall establish a procedure for accepting,
approving, and disapproving charter school applications in
accordance with subsection E of this section. The Statewide Charter
School Board shall post its application, application process, and
application time frames on the Board's website.
K. Sponsors including the Statewide Charter School Board shall
develop and maintain chartering policies and practices consistent
with recognized principles and standards for quality charter
sponsoring in all major areas of sponsoring responsibility including
organizational capacity and infrastructure, soliciting and
evaluating charter school and virtual charter school applications,
performance contracting, ongoing charter school and virtual charter
school oversight and evaluation, and charter contract renewal
decision-making.

Req. No. 12406 Page 14

L. Sponsors acting in their official capacity shall be immune
from civil and criminal liability with respect to all activities
related to a charter school with which they contract.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-12406 AQH 02/05/25














Req. No. 12406 Page 15